Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Chapter 28. Department of Corrections.

Administrative Code. —

For department of corrections, see 22 AAC.

Sec. 44.28.010.
Commissioner of corrections.

The principal executive officer of the Department of Corrections is the commissioner of corrections.

History.

(E.O. No. 55, § 38 (1984))

Sec. 44.28.020.
Duties of department.

The Department of Corrections shall administer the state programs of corrections, including

state adult penal institutions;

probation and parole supervision; and

extraditions and detainers.

The department shall, with the approval of the Council on Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault, adopt standards, by regulation, for rehabilitation programs for perpetrators of domestic violence as defined in AS

18.66.990

and for the approval of those programs. For purposes of AS

12.55.101

, AS

18.66.100(c)

, and AS

33.16.150(f)

, the department shall approve a program if the department determines that the program meets the standards. Upon application of a program, the department may waive one or more standards and approve the program if the department determines

there is good cause for the waiver;

the safety of victims and children is not compromised by the waiver;

an acceptable alternative is provided by the program.

The department shall establish an automated inmate information system to allow persons to place surcharge telephone calls to obtain information concerning inmates and where they are incarcerated, bail and bond information, and information concerning visiting hours at institutions. A system established under this subsection shall be designed so that

all the costs of the system are, at a minimum, met by the revenues received from calls to the system; and

the revenues received satisfy or defray the costs of establishing and maintaining an automated victim notification system established under AS

12.61.050

.

History.

(E.O. No. 55, § 38 (1984); am § 65 ch 64 SLA 1996; am § 3 ch 73 SLA 1997; am § 16 ch 86 SLA 1998; am § 93 ch 21 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For programs for rehabilitation of perpetrators of domestic violence, see 22 AAC 25.

Sec. 44.28.030.
Regulations.

The commissioner may adopt regulations to carry out or assist in carrying out the powers and duties of the department.

History.

(E.O. No. 55, § 38 (1984))

Administrative Code. —

For admission to adult correctional facilities, see 22 AAC 5, art. 1.

For security, see 22 AAC 5, art. 2.

For operations, see 22 AAC 5, art. 3.

For classification, see 22 AAC 5, art. 4.

For programs, see 22 AAC 5, art. 5.

For discipline, see 22 AAC 5, art. 6.

For segregation, see 22 AAC 5, art. 7.

For communications, see 22 AAC 5, art. 8.

For discharge, see 22 AAC 5, art. 9.

For probation, see 22 AAC 10, art. 1.

For sex offender treatment providers, see 22 AAC 30.